Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.205

Federal funds and programs—Participating agencies to give notice—Progress reports.

(1) Whenever an agency makes application, enters into a contract or agreement, or submits state plans for participation in, and for grants of federal funds under any federal law, the agency making such application shall at the time of such action, give notice in such form and manner as the director of financial management may prescribe, or the chair of the joint legislative audit and review committee, standing committees on ways and means of the house and senate, the chief clerk of the house, or the secretary of the senate may request.

(2) Whenever any such application, contract, agreement, or state plan is amended, such agency shall notify each such officer of such action in the same manner as prescribed or requested pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Such agency shall promptly furnish such progress reports in relation to each such application, contract, agreement, or state plan as may be requested following the date of the filing of the application, contract, agreement, or state plan; and shall also file with each such officer a final report as to the final disposition of each such application, contract, agreement, or state plan if such is requested.

[ 1996 c 288 s 39; 1979 c 151 s 141; 1975 1st ex.s. c 293 s 10; 1973 2nd ex.s. c 17 s 3; 1967 ex.s. c 41 s 4.]

NOTES:

Acceptance of funds by governor, administration: RCW 43.06.120, 43.06.130.